Utah statutes.
59-14-607.   Administrative rulemaking authority.

(1)  The commission may promulgate administrative rules as necessary to enforce the provisions of this part.

(2)  The rules authorized by this part include rules:

(a)  to verify information concerning the escrow deposits required by Section 59-14-602;

(b)  regarding the production of information sufficient to enable the commission to determine the adequacy of the amount of the installment deposit required by this part;

(c)  regarding the certification required by Section 59-14-602;

(d)  necessary to receive and publish information for the directory required by Section 59-14-603;

(e)  regarding the notification requirements for the appointment of an agent for service of process in Section 59-14-605;

(f)  for reporting by stamping agents or manufacturers of tobacco products under Section 59-14-606; and

(g)  as authorized by this part or the Master Settlement Agreement.

